Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 7.9 Permanent Joint Committee on Economic Development

22-7.9-1.
Permanent committee — Composition.

There is created a permanent joint committee of the general assembly on economic development to consist of eleven (11) members of the general assembly, five (5) of whom shall be from the senate to be appointed by the president of the senate not more than three (3) of whom shall be from the same political party, and six (6) of whom shall be from the house of representatives to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives not more than four (4) of whom shall be from the same political party. The selection of the chairperson, vice-chairperson, and secretary of the committee shall alternate biennially between the president of the senate and the speaker of the house as set forth in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 70.

22-7.9-2.
Repealed.

22-7.9-3.
Duties.

It shall be the duty of the joint committee on economic development to promote and encourage the preservation, expansion, and sound development of new and existing industry, business, commerce, agriculture, tourism, and recreational facilities in the state, which will promote the economic development of the state and the general welfare of its citizens.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 220, § 1.

22-7.9-4.
Reports and recommendations.

The joint committee on economic development shall from time to time and at least annually report to the general assembly on its findings and the results of its studies, and make any recommendations to the general assembly and propose any legislation or initiate any studies that it shall deem advisable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 220, § 1.

22-7.9-5.
References to committee.

Each branch of the legislature may refer to the joint committee, either initially or after action by other committees, all bills and resolutions dealing with or affecting economic development; provided, that the joint committee shall not act on any bill that has a fiscal impact. The joint committee shall transfer any bill with a fiscal impact to the finance committee of the branch of the legislature from which the bill originated.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 220, § 1.

22-7.9-6.
Place of meeting — Quorum.

The joint committee on legislative services shall provide adequate space in the state house for the use of the joint committee on economic development; provided, that the joint committee on economic development may conduct hearings and hold meetings elsewhere when doing so will better serve its purposes. A majority in number of the joint committee on economic development shall be necessary to constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 220, § 1.